Arkansas, session 2025, SB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-3-703(2), concerning the definitions to
be used in relation to the Arkansas Small Business Innovation Research
Matching Grant Program, is amended to read as follows:
(2) “Matching grant” means a discretionary grant of up to fifty
percent (50%) of the amount of a federal Small Business Innovation Research
grant or Small Business Technology Transfer grant for each approved matching
grant application;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-3-703(4), concerning the definitions to
be used in relation to the Arkansas Small Business Innovation Research
Matching Grant Program, is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Small Business Innovation Research Program” means the
federal program administered by the United States Small Business
Administration according to regulations adopted pursuant to 15 U.S.C. § 638,
as it existed on October 1, 2016, which provides funds for Phase I and Phase
II Small Business Innovation Research grants and Small Business Technology
*JLL188*
02/11/2025 4:43:03 PM JLL188

SB218
Transfer grants through participating federal agencies.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code §§ 15-3-704 — 15-3-707 are amended to read as
follows:
15-3-704. Administration.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Small Business Innovation Research Matching Grant
Program is created.
(2) The Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission shall administer the program.
(b) The division commission shall:
(1) Create application forms to be submitted by eligible
businesses seeking a matching grant from the program;
(2) Devise an application process that:
(A) Defines the eligibility criteria for a matching grant;
and
(B) Establishes application submittal and review
processes;
(3) Define a process by which matching grants may be awarded;
and
(4) Execute standard legal grant agreements and other
documentation governing the disbursement and use of matching grants.

15-3-705. Eligibility.
(a) To be eligible for a matching grant under this subchapter, an
applicant shall:
(1) Be an eligible business; and
(2) Certify that:
(A) The eligible business:
(i) For Phase I applications, has received a Small
Business Innovation Research grant or a Small Business Technology Transfer
grant from a sponsoring agency in response to a specific federal
solicitation; or
(ii) For Phase II applications, has:
(a) Submitted a final Phase I report to the
sponsoring agency;
(b) Demonstrated that the sponsoring agency
02/11/2025 4:43:03 PM JLL188

SB218
has interest in the Phase II proposal; and
(c) Submitted a Phase II proposal to the
sponsoring agency; and
(B) All cognizant federal Small Business Innovation
Research grant requirements will be met.
(b) An eligible business awarded a matching grant under this
subchapter shall:
(1) Remain in Arkansas for the duration of the matching grant
project award period;
(2) Designate an Arkansas resident or employee as the principal
investigator/project manager during the duration of the matching grant award
period; and
(3) Be principally engaged in one (1) or more of the following
targeted business activities:
(A) Advanced materials and manufacturing systems;
(B) Agriculture, food, and environmental sciences;
(C) Biotechnology, bioengineering, and life sciences;
(D) Information technology;
(E) Transportation logistics; and
(F) Bio-based products.

15-3-706. Application requirements.
(a) To request a matching grant under this subchapter, an applicant
shall complete and submit the application forms prescribed by the Division of
Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission under
§ 15-3-704.
(b) An applicant shall submit an application for each federal Phase I
and federal Phase II grant proposal for which the applicant is requesting a
matching grant.
(c) The division commission shall:
(1) Review applications:
(A) In order of receipt, as determined by the date and
time stamp of receipt; and
(B) In accordance with rules promulgated by the division
commission under § 15-3-709; and
(2) Not consider an incomplete or noncompliant application and
02/11/2025 4:43:03 PM JLL188

SB218
shall return an incomplete or a noncompliant application without further
review;
(3) Review each application with the advice and recommendation
of the Commercialization Committee of the Board of Directors of the Division
of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission;
and
(4) Provide advice to the Director of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission concerning the applications for matching grants
reviewed by the division.
(d)(1) Applications submitted to the division commission are subject
to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.
(2) To the extent an applicant believes that information in an
application is confidential or otherwise exempt under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., the applicant shall
specifically designate in writing the information the applicant believes to
be confidential or exempt and the basis for the confidentiality or exemption
on that portion of the application in which the information appears.

15-3-707. Matching grant awards.
(a) A matching grant awarded under this subchapter:
(1) Shall not:
(A) Be awarded under this subchapter unless offered in
writing by the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission; and
(B) Exceed fifty percent (50%) of the federal Small
Business Innovation Research award or the Small Business Technology Transfer
award, up to:
(i) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a matching
grant awarded to match a federal Phase I award; and
(ii) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for a
matching grant awarded to match a federal Phase II award; and
(2) Subject to funding and the discretion of the director, may
be offered to an eligible applicant that successfully completes the
application process.
(b) The matching grant agreement between the Division of Science and
Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission and the eligible
applicant shall delineate all requirements of the matching grant.
02/11/2025 4:43:03 PM JLL188

SB218
(c) At least fifty-one percent (51%) of the amount awarded for the
matching grant shall be spent in Arkansas.
(d) Disbursements for matching grants shall be made on a reimbursable
basis, payable when invoices and financial reports are submitted to and
approved by the division commission.
(e) An eligible business shall not receive more than three (3)
matching grants under this subchapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-3-709 is amended to read as follows:
15-3-709. Rules.
The Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission shall promulgate rules to carry out the purposes of
this subchapter.























02/11/2025 4:43:03 PM JLL188